Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.185

Discrimination prohibited—Costs immaterial.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purpose of RCW 18.53.165 through 18.53.180 and 18.53.190 it is immaterial whether the cost of any policy, plan, agreement, or contract be deemed additional compensation for services, or otherwise.

[ 1973 c 48 s 5.]